Illinois, session 104th, HB851.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Burn Injury Reporting Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 7/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Burn 8Injury Reporting Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-828, eff. 1-1-07.)